th: จุดเน้นสุขภาพของอาหารเสริม: บำรุงกระดูกและข้อต่อ; สุขภาพสมองและความจำ; สุขภาพระบบย่อยอาหาร; พลังงานและการเผาผลาญ; สุขภาพดวงตา; ผม; สุขภาพหัวใจ; เสริมภูมิคุ้มกัน; ตะปู; สุขภาพแม่และเด็ก; สุขภาพผิว; การควบคุมน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
ko: 보충제 건강 초점: 뼈 및 관절 지원; 뇌 및 인지 건강; 소화기 건강; 에너지 및 신진대사; 눈 건강; 헤어; 심장 건강; 면역 지원; 못; 산전 및 모성 건강; 피부 건강; 체중 관리; 기타
tr: Takviye sağlık odağı: Kemik ve eklem desteği; Beyin ve bilişsel sağlık; Sindirim sağlığı; Enerji ve metabolizma; Göz sağlığı; Saç; Kalp sağlığı; Bağışıklık desteği; Çiviler; Doğum öncesi ve anne sağlığı; Cilt sağlığı; Kilo yönetimi; Diğer
ru: Назначение добавки: Поддержка костей и суставов; Здоровье мозга и когнитивные функции; Здоровье пищеварительной системы; Энергия и метаболизм; Здоровье глаз; Волосы; Здоровье сердца; Поддержка иммунитета; Гвозди; Пренатальное и материнское здоровье; Здоровье кожи; Контроль веса; Другой
sl-SI: Zdravstveni fokus dodatka: Podpora kostem in sklepom; Zdravje možganov in kognitivne sposobnosti; Zdravje prebave; Energija in metabolizem; Zdravje oči; Lasje; Zdravje srca; Podpora imunskemu sistemu; Žeblji; Prenatalno in materinsko zdravje; Zdravje kože; Uravnavanje telesne teže; Drugo
hu: Kiegészítő egészségügyi fókusz: Csont- és ízületi támogatás; Agy- és kognitív egészség; Emésztőrendszer egészsége; Energia és anyagcsere; Szemegészség; Haj; Szívegészség; Immunerősítés; Szegecsek; Prenatális és anyai egészség; Bőregészség; Súlykontroll; Egyéb
it: Focus salutare dell'integratore: Supporto osseo e articolare; Salute cerebrale e cognitiva; Salute dell'apparato digerente; Energia e metabolismo; Salute degli occhi; Capelli; Salute del cuore; Supporto immunitario; Chiodi; Salute prenatale e materna; Salute della pelle; Gestione del peso; Altro
nb: Kosttilskudd helsefokus: Bein- og leddstøtte; Hjerne- og kognitiv helse; Fordøyelseshelse; Energi og metabolisme; Øyehelse; Hår; Hjertehelse; Immunstøtte; Spiker; Prenatal og mødrehelse; Hudhelse; Vektkontroll; Annet
nl: Gezondheidsfocus supplement: Bot- en gewrichtsondersteuning; Hersenen en cognitieve gezondheid; Spijsverteringsgezondheid; Energie en metabolisme; Ooggezondheid; Haar; Hartgezondheid; Immuunondersteuning; Spijkers; Prenatale en maternale gezondheid; Huidgezondheid; Gewichtsbeheer; Andere
cs: Zdravotní zaměření doplňku: Podpora kostí a kloubů; Zdraví mozku a kognitivní funkce; Péče o zažívací trakt; Energie a metabolismus; Zdraví očí; Vlasy; Zdraví srdce; Podpora imunity; Hřebíky; Prenatální a mateřské zdraví; Zdraví pokožky; Řízení hmotnosti; Jiné
da: Sundhedsfokus for kosttilskud: Knogle- og ledstøtte; Hjerne- og kognitiv sundhed; Fordøjelsessundhed; Energi og stofskifte; Øjensundhed; Hår; Hjertesundhed; Immunstøtte; Søm; Prænatal og mødresundhed; Hudsundhed; Vægtkontrol; Andet
sv: Kosttillskottets hälsofokus: Ben- och ledstöd; Hjärn- och kognitiv hälsa; Matsmältningshälsa; Energi och metabolism; Ögonhälsa; Hår; Hjärthälsa; Immunstöd; Spikar; Prenatal och mödrahälsa; Hudhälsa; Vikthantering; Övrigt
el: Εστίαση υγείας συμπληρώματος: Υποστήριξη οστών και αρθρώσεων; Εγκεφαλική και γνωστική υγεία; Πεπτική υγεία; Ενέργεια και μεταβολισμός; Υγεία ματιών; Μαλλιά; Καρδιακή υγεία; Ανοσοποιητική υποστήριξη; Καρφιά; Προγεννητική και μητρική υγεία; Υγεία δέρματος; Διαχείριση βάρους; Άλλο
lt-LT: Maisto papildo sveikatos kryptis: Kaulų ir sąnarių palaikymas; Smegenų ir pažintinė sveikata; Virškinamojo trakto sveikata; Energija ir medžiagų apykaita; Akių sveikata; Plaukai; Širdies sveikata; Imuninės sistemos palaikymas; Vinys; Prenatalinė ir motinos sveikata; Odos sveikata; Svorio valdymas; Kita
vi: Trọng tâm sức khỏe của thực phẩm bổ sung: Hỗ trợ xương và khớp; Sức khỏe não bộ và nhận thức; Sức khỏe tiêu hóa; Năng lượng và trao đổi chất; Sức khỏe mắt; Tóc; Sức khỏe tim mạch; Hỗ trợ miễn dịch; Đinh; Sức khỏe thai sản và bà mẹ; Sức khỏe da; Quản lý cân nặng; Khác
hr-HR: Zdravstveni fokus dodatka prehrani: Potpora kostima i zglobovima; Zdravlje mozga i kognitivne funkcije; Zdravlje probavnog sustava; Energija i metabolizam; Zdravlje očiju; Kosa; Zdravlje srca; Potpora imunitetu; Čavli; Prenatalno i majčinsko zdravlje; Zdravlje kože; Kontrola težine; Ostalo
zh-TW: 營養補充品健康重點: 骨骼和關節支持; 大腦和認知健康; 消化系統健康; 能量和代謝; 眼睛健康; 頭髮; 心臟健康; 免疫支持; 釘子; 產前和母體健康; 皮膚健康; 體重管理; 其他
ja: サプリメント健康焦点: 骨と関節のサポート; 脳と認知機能の健康; 消化器の健康; エネルギーと代謝; 目の健康; ヘア; 心臓の健康; 免疫サポート; 釘; 妊娠期と母体の健康; 肌の健康; 体重管理; その他
pt-PT: Foco de saúde do suplemento: Suporte ósseo e articular; Saúde cerebral e cognitiva; Saúde digestiva; Energia e metabolismo; Saúde ocular; Cabelo; Saúde cardíaca; Suporte imunitário; Pregos; Saúde pré-natal e materna; Saúde da pele; Gestão de peso; Outro
pl: Cel zdrowotny suplementu: Wsparcie kości i stawów; Zdrowie mózgu i funkcje poznawcze; Zdrowie układu trawiennego; Energia i metabolizm; Zdrowie oczu; Włosy; Zdrowie serca; Wsparcie odporności; Gwoździe; Zdrowie prenatalne i macierzyńskie; Zdrowie skóry; Kontrola wagi; Inne
es: Enfoque de salud del suplemento: Soporte para huesos y articulaciones; Salud cerebral y cognitiva; Salud digestiva; Energía y metabolismo; Salud ocular; Cabello; Salud cardíaca; Soporte inmunológico; Clavos; Salud prenatal y materna; Salud de la piel; Control de peso; Otros
zh-CN: 补充剂健康重点: 骨骼和关节支持; 大脑和认知健康; 消化系统健康; 能量和新陈代谢; 眼睛健康; 头发; 心脏健康; 免疫支持; 钉子; 产前和孕妇健康; 皮肤健康; 体重管理; 其他
de: Gesundheitsfokus des Nahrungsergänzungsmittels: Knochen- und Gelenkunterstützung; Gehirn- und kognitive Gesundheit; Gesundheit des Verdauungssystems; Energie und Stoffwechsel; Augengesundheit; Haare; Herzgesundheit; Immununterstützung; Nägel; Pränatale und mütterliche Gesundheit; Hautgesundheit; Gewichtsmanagement; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Здравен фокус на добавката: Поддръжка на кости и стави; Мозъчно и когнитивно здраве; Здраве на храносмилателната система; Енергия и метаболизъм; Очно здраве; Коса; Сърдечно здраве; Имунна поддръжка; Пирони; Пренатално и майчино здраве; Здраве на кожата; Управление на теглото; Други
fr: Objectif santé du complément alimentaire: Soutien des os et des articulations; Santé cérébrale et cognitive; Santé digestive; Énergie et métabolisme; Santé oculaire; Cheveux; Santé cardiaque; Soutien immunitaire; Clous; Santé prénatale et maternelle; Santé de la peau; Gestion du poids; Autre
pt-BR: Foco de saúde do suplemento: Suporte ósseo e articular; Saúde cerebral e cognitiva; Saúde digestiva; Energia e metabolismo; Saúde ocular; Cabelo; Saúde cardíaca; Suporte imunológico; Pregos; Saúde pré-natal e materna; Saúde da pele; Gerenciamento de peso; Outro
ro-RO: Focusul de sănătate al suplimentului: Suport pentru oase și articulații; Sănătatea creierului și cognitivă; Sănătatea digestivă; Energie și metabolism; Sănătatea ochilor; Păr; Sănătatea inimii; Suport imunitar; Cuie; Sănătate prenatală și maternă; Sănătatea pielii; Gestionarea greutății; Altele
sk-SK: Zdravotné zameranie doplnku: Podpora kostí a kĺbov; Zdravie mozgu a kognitívne funkcie; Zdravie tráviaceho traktu; Energia a metabolizmus; Zdravie očí; Vlasy; Zdravie srdca; Podpora imunity; Klince; Prenatálne a materské zdravie; Zdravie pokožky; Riadenie hmotnosti; Iné
fi: Ravintolisän terveyspainotus: Luuston ja nivelten tuki; Aivot ja kognitiivinen terveys; Ruoansulatuskanavan terveys; Energia ja aineenvaihdunta; Silmien terveys; Hiukset; Sydänterveys; Vastustuskyvyn tuki; Naulat; Raskaus- ja äitiysterveys; Ihon terveys; Painonhallinta; Muu
en: Supplement health focus: Bone and joint support; Brain and cognitive health; Digestive health; Energy and metabolism; Eye health; Hair; Heart health; Immune support; Nails; Prenatal and maternal health; Skin health; Weight management; Other